District of Columbia statutes.
37-203.01

“Barrel of corn” defined.

Three hundred and fifty pounds of corn on the cob shall constitute a barrel and 280 pounds of shelled corn shall constitute a barrel; provided, that nothing in this section shall be held to prohibit the sale of corn on the cob by the barrel.

Mar. 3, 1899, 30 Stat. 1346, ch. 432, § 2
1981 Ed., § 10-122.
1973 Ed., § 10-121.